en: Transfer application method: Heat press; Household iron; No-heat (rub-on); Sew-on (printable appliqué); Other
bg-BG: Метод за прехвърляне на изображение: Термопреса; Ютия; Без нагряване (натриване); Пришиване (апликация за печат); Друго
el: Μέθοδος εφαρμογής μεταφοράς: Πρέσα θερμότητας; Οικιακό σίδερο; Χωρίς θερμότητα (με τρίψιμο); Ραφτό (εκτυπώσιμο απλικέ); Άλλο
sv: Appliceringsmetod för transfer: Värmepress; Strykjärn; Utan värme (gnuggbild); Sy fast (utskrivbar applikation); Övrigt
pt-BR: Método de aplicação de transferência: Prensa térmica; Ferro de passar; Sem calor (fricção); Para costurar (aplique imprimível); Outro
hr-HR: Način primjene transfera: Toplinska preša; Kućno glačalo; Bez topline (utrljavanje); Našivanje (aplikacija za ispis); Ostalo
fi: Siirtokuvan kiinnitysmenetelmä: Lämpöprässi; Silitysrauta; Ilman lämpöä (hierottava); Ommeltava (tulostettava applikointi); Muu
sk-SK: Spôsob prepravy: Tepelný lis; Žehlička pre domácnosť; Bez tepla (pretlačovacie); Našitie (potlačiteľná aplikácia); Iné
sl-SI: Metoda nanašanja za preslikavo: Toplotna stiskalnica; Domači likalnik; Brez toplote (vtiranje); Našitek (aplikacija za tisk); Drugo
cs: Metoda nanášení obtisku: Termolis; Žehlička; Za studena (propisot); Našívací (potištitelná aplikace); Jiné
da: Påføringsmetode for transfer: Varmepresse; Strygejern; Uden varme (rub-on); Til påsyning (printbar applikation); Andet
de: Auftragungsmethode: Transferpresse; Haushaltsbügeleisen; Ohne Hitze (zum Aufrubbeln); Zum Aufnähen (bedruckbare Applikation); Sonstige
th: วิธีการสกรีนแบบทรานเฟอร์: เครื่องรีดร้อน; เตารีดทั่วไป; ไม่ใช้ความร้อน (แบบถู); เย็บติด (ผ้าปะติดที่พิมพ์ได้); อื่นๆ
ko: 전사지 부착 방식: 열 프레스; 가정용 다리미; 비가열(문지르기); 재봉(인쇄 가능 아플리케); 기타
vi: Phương pháp dập hình chuyển nhiệt: Ép nhiệt; Bàn ủi gia dụng; Không cần nhiệt (chà xát); May vào (đáp vải có thể in); Khác
es: Método de aplicación de transferencia: Prensa térmica; Plancha de uso doméstico; Sin calor (por fricción); Para coser (aplique imprimible); Otro
zh-CN: 转印应用方法: 热压; 家用熨斗; 免加热（摩擦转印）; 缝制（可打印贴花）; 其他
tr: Transfer uygulama yöntemi: Isı presi; Ev tipi ütü; Isısız (sürterek); Dikilebilir (yazdırılabilir aplike); Diğer
nl: Aanbrengmethode transfer: Hittepers; Strijkijzer; Geen hitte (rub-on); Opnaaibaar (bedrukbare applicatie); Overig
pl: Metoda nakładania poprzez transfer: Prasa termiczna; Żelazko domowe; Bez użycia ciepła (przez potarcie); Naszywane (aplikacja do druku); Inne
ro-RO: Metodă de aplicare a transferului: Presă termică; Fier de călcat; Fără încălzire (prin frecare); De cusut (aplicație imprimabilă); Altele
it: Metodo di applicazione del trasferimento: Termopressa; Ferro da stiro domestico; A freddo (a sfregamento); Da cucire (applicazione stampabile); Altro
nb: Applikasjonsmetode for overførbar design: Varmepresse; Strykejern; Uten varme (gni-på); Påsying (utskrivbar applikasjon); Annet
hu: Transzfer felviteli mód: Hőprés; Háztartási vasaló; Hőmentes (dörzsölős); Felvarrható (nyomtatható applikáció); Egyéb
lt-LT: Atspaudo uždėjimo būdas: Karštas presavimas; Buitinis lygintuvas; Be karščio (užtrinama); Prisiuvama (spausdinama aplikacija); Kita
zh-TW: 轉印應用方式: 熱壓; 家用熨斗; 免加熱 (刮擦轉印); 縫紉 (可列印貼布繡); 其他
pt-PT: Método de aplicação da transferência: Prensa térmica; Ferro de engomar; Sem calor (fricção); Para costurar (aplique imprimível); Outro
ru: Метод переноса изображения: Термопресс; Бытовой утюг; Без нагрева (втираемые); Пришивание (аппликация для печати); Другое
ja: 転送適用方法: ヒートプレス; 家庭用アイロン; 熱不要 (こすり付け); 縫い付け式 (印刷可能アップリケ); その他
fr: Procédure de demande de transfert: Presse à chaud; Fer à repasser domestique; Sans chaleur (par frottement); À coudre (appliqué imprimable); Autre